tests/aor-phon.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  ../tur.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../tur.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[twol] {i} aor after vowel":
    pudrala<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : pudralar
    pudrala<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : pudralarım

  "[twol] {i} aor after cons":
    yen<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : yenir
    yen<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : yenirim

  "[twol] {i} aor after passive":
    pudrala<v><tv><pass><aor><p3><sg> : pudralanır
    pudrala<v><tv><pass><aor><p1><sg> : pudralanırım

  "[twol] forms with {z}:0":
    git<v><iv><neg><aor><p1><sg> : gitmem
    git<v><iv><neg><aor><p1><pl> : gitmeyiz
    git<v><iv><abil><neg><aor><p1><sg> : gidemem
    git<v><iv><abil><neg><aor><p1><pl> : gidemeyiz

  "[twol] forms with {z}:z":
    git<v><iv><neg><aor><p2><sg> : gitmezsin
    git<v><iv><neg><aor><p2><pl> : gitmezsiniz
    git<v><iv><abil><neg><aor><p2><sg> : gidemezsin
    git<v><iv><abil><neg><aor><p2><pl> : gidemezsiniz
